District of Columbia statutes.
1-628.05

Agreements for disciplinary appeals.

The Mayor is authorized to enter into agreements with appropriate federal agencies to authorize them to continue the processing of administrative appeals of personnel actions by District government employees until such time as the rules and regulations of the Office of Employee Appeals are issued and the provisions of subchapter XVI of this chapter become effective. The agreement of the Mayor may provide for the existing standards of cause for disciplinary actions to continue in effect for the duration of the agreement.

Aug. 7, 1980, D.C. Law 3-81, § 2(ff), 27 DCR 2632
1981 Ed., § 1-629.5.